Delaware, session 153, SB85.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF DELAWARE (Two-thirds of all members elected to each house thereof concurring therein): Section 1. Amend Chapter 5, Title 11 of the Delaware Code by making deletions as shown by strike through and insertions as shown by underline as follows: Â§ 1105A. Endangering the welfare of a vulnerable adult; class A misdemeanor. (a) A person is guilty of endangering the welfare of a vulnerable adult when the person being a guardian or any other person who has assumed responsibility for the care or supervision of the vulnerable adult the person: (1) Intentionally, knowingly, or recklessly acts in a manner likely to be injurious to the physical, mental, or moral welfare of the vulnerable adult; or (2) Intentionally, knowingly, or recklessly does or fails to do any act, including failing to report a missing vulnerable adult, with the result that the vulnerable adult becomes a neglected or abused adult. (b) âVulnerable adultâ means a person 18 years of age or older who, by reason of isolation, sickness, debilitation, mental illness or physical, mental, or cognitive disability, is easily susceptible to abuse, neglect, mistreatment, maltreatment, intimidation, manipulation, coercion, or exploitation. Without limitation, the term âvulnerable adultâ includes any adult for whom a guardian or the person or property had been appointed. (c) Endangering the welfare of a vulnerable adult is a class A misdemeanor.